California, session 20252026, SB1179.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 2130) is added to Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: Article 6.5. Doctors from El Salvador Program2130. For purposes of this article:(a)“Committee” means the program administration committee established pursuant to Section 2130.2. (a) “Board” means the Medical Board of California.(b) “Licensee” means a person licensed under the program.(c)“Primary administrator” means the Clínica Monseñor Oscar A. Romero.(d)(c) “Program” means the Doctors from El Salvador Program established pursuant to this article.2130.1. The Doctors from El Salvador Program is hereby established for the purpose of permitting licensed physicians from El Salvador to practice medicine, including, but not limited to, family medicine, internal medicine, pediatrics, obstetrics and gynecology, and psychiatry, in California for up to three years.2130.2.(a)The program administration committee is hereby established.(b)The committee shall be composed of the following members:(1)Two individuals designated by the primary administrator.(2)Two individuals designated by the Universidad Evangélica de El Salvador.(3)Two individuals designated by the Universidad de El Salvador.(c)The Clínica Monseñor Oscar A. Romero shall serve as the primary administrator and lead representative of the committee.2130.3.The committee shall do all of the following:(a)Develop an interview examination for each specialty area.(b)Develop an orientation program that meets all of the following requirements:(1)It is modeled after the orientation program developed for the Licensed Physicians and Dentists from Mexico Pilot Program established pursuant to former Section 853.(2)It includes all of the following components:(A)Medical protocol.(B)Community clinic history and operations.(C)Medical administration.(D)Hospital operations and protocol.(E)Medical ethics.(F)The California medical delivery systems.(G)Health maintenance organizations and managed care practices.(H)Medication documentation and reconciliation.(I)The electronic medical records system utilized by federally qualified health centers.(J)Standards for medical record documentation to support medical decisionmaking and quality care.(3)It is approved by the board.(c)Recruit and vet candidates for the program.(d)Act as the point of contact for candidates for the program and assist those candidates with meeting the requirements for the program.(e)Select appropriate federally qualified health centers in California.(f)Ensure compliance with program provisions.(g)Develop policy and clinical workshops.(h)Monitor productivity and increased access to medical care.(i)Assess the necessity of policy or programmatic improvements.2130.2. The program shall be developed in consultation with representatives from a community health clinic in California that has an established partnership and framework with the Universidad Evangélica de El Salvador and Universidad de El Salvador, and shall include the following:(a) Coordinating entities for securing required documents.(b) Recruiting and vetting candidates.(c) Assisting candidates for the program in El Salvador to meet all program requirements.(d) Selecting appropriate federally qualified health centers throughout California.(e) Ensuring compliance with program provisions.(f) Developing policy and clinical workshops.(g) Monitoring productivity and increased access to medical care.(h) Assessing the necessity of policy and programmatic improvements.2130.4.2130.3. The board shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of all applicants for a physician’s and surgeon’s license under the program to determine whether the applicant has a criminal conviction record in this state or in any other jurisdiction, including foreign countries, pursuant to Section 2042. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- and federal-level response in accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code for the board to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure under the provisions of Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) and Section 2221.2130.5.2130.4. Subject to Section 2130.6, 2130.5, the board shall issue a nonrenewable three-year physician’s and surgeon’s license to a person who meets all of the following requirements:(a) The person is licensed, certified, or recertified, and in good standing in the applicable medical specialty in El Salvador. This certification or recertification shall be performed, as appropriate, by the Consejo Nacional de las Especialidades Médicas or the Ministry of Health in El Salvador.(b) Before leaving El Salvador, the person has completed all of the following:(1) Passed the applicable medical review course with a score equivalent to that required of United States applicants for each of the person’s specialty areas. board review course with a score equivalent to that registered by United States applicants when passing a board review course for the United States certification examination in each of the physician’s specialty areas and passed an interview examination the entities developed in consultation with the community health clinic referenced in Section 2130.2 for each specialty area. A family practitioner who includes obstetrics and gynecology in their practice shall not perform deliveries in California unless they have performed 50 live birth deliveries, as required by United States standards, confirmed by written documentation by the supervising department chair, hospital administrator, or hospital chief medical officer. Each obstetrician and gynecologist from El Salvador shall be a fellow in good standing of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(2) Passed the committee’s an interview examination created in consultation with the community health clinic referenced in Section 2130.2 for each of the person’s specialty areas.(3) Satisfactorily completed the committee’s orientation program. an orientation program developed in consultation with the community health clinic referenced in Section 2130.2.(4) Provided written documentation to the board that they have scored at least 85 percent on the Test of English as a Foreign Language or at least 350 on the Occupational English Test.2130.6.2130.5. (a) Subject to subdivision (b), notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, of Section 30, the board shall issue a license to an applicant who meets the requirements of Section 2130.3 even if the applicant has not provided an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number to the board.(b) A licensee who has not provided an individual taxpayer identification number or social security number to the board shall not engage in the practice of medicine unless all of the following conditions are met:(1) The licensee sought an appropriate three-year visa and accompanying social security number from the federal government within 14 days of licensure under the program.(2) The licensee provided the board their social security number within 10 days of issuance of the number by the federal government.(3) The board notified the licensee that it has determined that the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) have been met.(c) The board shall promptly provide the notification described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) to the licensee once the board has made the determination described in that subparagraph.2130.7.2130.6. If a licensee is a family practitioner who includes obstetrics and gynecology in their practice, they shall not perform deliveries in California unless they have written documentation from a supervising department chair, hospital administrator, or hospital chief medical officer that they have performed 50 live birth deliveries in accordance with United States standards. Each license who practices as an obstetrician and gynecologist shall be a fellow in good standing of the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.2130.8.2130.7. A licensee shall complete 25 continuing education units each year. The board may randomly audit a licensee to ensure compliance with this section and may issue a citation and administrative fine against a licensee who fails to comply with this section.2130.9.2130.8. (a) A federally qualified health center employing a licensee shall continue the peer review protocols and procedures as required by the federal government.(b) The federally qualified health centers shall work with a California medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 or a residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education to conduct 10 secondary reviews of randomly selected patient encounters with each licensee per six-month period, and the reviews shall be transmitted to the approved medical school or medical institution with an approved residency program in PDF format.(c) The secondary reviews shall be undertaken every six months of each year for the three years that the licensee is employed by a federally qualified health center.(d) The faculty reviewers in family medicine, pediatrics, internal medicine, psychiatry, and obstetrics and gynecology from the California medical school approved by the board pursuant to Section 2084 or the residency program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education shall provide feedback to the federally qualified health centers of the findings of their secondary reviews.(e) The faculty and federally qualified health center chief medical officers shall jointly develop no less than two quality assurance seminars for all licensees to attend during the six months of secondary reviews conducted. The purpose of the approved medical school or medical institution with an approved residency program secondary peer reviews shall be to provide feedback on compliance with medical standards, protocols, and procedures required by the federal government and assessed by the monthly or quarterly peer reviews conducted by federally qualified health centers. The associated costs for the secondary reviews and quality assurance seminars shall be the responsibility of the federally qualified health centers on a pro rata basis.2130.10.2130.9. (a) A licensee shall only practice medicine in California at a federally qualified health center and any corresponding hospital. only in the nonprofit community health center that offered the licensee employment and the corresponding hospital.(b) A federally qualified health center employing a licensee shall do all of the following:(1) Apply peer review protocols and procedures required by federal law to each licensee.(2) Create and maintain medical quality assurance protocols for licensees.(3) Obtain and maintain accreditation by the Joint Commission, the National Committee for Quality Assurance, or the Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care, as applicable.(4) Provide all applicable employment benefits, salary, and policies to licensees as are provided to the center’s other employees, including, but not limited to, malpractice insurance coverage.2130.10. The board shall coordinate with the community health clinic referenced in Section 2130.2 to ensure that the number of program participants that are issued a current and active license does not exceed the following: (a) Between January 1, 2028 and January 1, 2032, no more than 60 participants. An applicant shall submit an application to the board between January 1, 2027, and June 1, 2027, to be admitted to the cohort commencing on January 1, 2028.(b) Between January 1, 2032, and January 1, 2036, no more than 85 participants. An applicants shall submit application to the board between January 1, 2031, and June 1, 2031.(c) Between January 1, 2036, and January 1, 2040, no more than 110 participants. An applicant shall submit an application to the board between January 1, 2035, and June 1, 2035.(d) Between January 1, 2040, and January 1, 2044, no more than 135 participants. An applicant shall submit an application to the board between January 1, 2039, and June 1, 2039.(e) Between January 1, 2044, and January 1, 2048, no more than 135 participants. An applicant shall submit an applicant to the board between January 1, 2043, and June 1, 2043.2130.11. (a) A license issued pursuant to the program shall be deemed to be a license in good standing pursuant to the provisions of this chapter for the purpose of participation in and reimbursement from all federal, state, and local health programs, including, but not limited to, the Medicare Program, the fee-for-service and managed care delivery systems of the Medi-Cal program, and private insurance.(b) A licensee shall not be denied credentials by a health plan because the licensee is a participant in the program and did not receive their medical education and training in the United States.2130.12. (a) The application and processing fee shall be the amount specified in subdivision (b) of Section 2435.(b) The initial license fee shall be one and one-half times the amount specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2435.(c) The fee for the Controlled Substance Utilization Review and Evaluation System (CURES) shall be three times the annual fee specified under subdivision (a) of Section 208.(d) The fee for the Steven M. Thompson Physician Corps Loan Repayment Program shall be one and one-half times the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 2436.5.(e) The fees required by this section shall be deposited into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California, except that the fee described in subdivision (c) shall be deposited into the CURES Fund.(f) Any unencumbered funds collected by the board pursuant to former Section 853 shall be deposited into the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California.2130.13. (a) Beginning 12 months after the program has commenced, an evaluation of the program shall be conducted by a medical school in southern California and one of the following:(1) The Universidad of El Salvador.(2) Universidad Evangélica de El Salvador.(3) A foreign medical school approved by the board.(b) The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the following matters:(1) Quality of care provided by licensees under this program.(2) Adaptability of these practitioners to California dental standards.(3) Impact on working and administrative environments in nonprofit community health centers and impact on interpersonal relations with medical licensed counterparts in health centers.(4) Response and approval by patients.(5) Impact on cultural and linguistic services.(6) Increases in medical encounters provided by participating practitioners to limited-English-speaking patient populations and increases in the number of limited-English-speaking patients seeking health care services from nonprofit community health centers.(7) Recommendations on whether the program should be continued, expanded, altered, or terminated.(c) If the evaluation required in subdivision (a) does not begin within 18 months after the program has commenced, the evaluation may be performed by an independent consultant selected by the Director of Consumer Affairs.(d) Progress reports on the matters specified in subdivision (b) shall be provided to the Legislature on achievable time intervals beginning in the second year of implementation of the program.(e) Costs for administering the program shall be secured from philanthropic entities.(f) Program applicants shall be responsible for working with the governments of El Salvador and the United States to obtain the necessary three-year visa required for program participation.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique and immediate need for physicians in California that have the cultural competency, language fluency, and requisite expertise to treat the large Latino patient population.